Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Voluntary Dissolution

48-24-101. Dissolution by incorporators or initial directors.

A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the corporation by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution and termination that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date of its incorporation;

Either that:

None of the corporation's shares has been issued; or

The corporation has not commenced business;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

That the net assets of the corporation remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares were issued; and

That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution and the date dissolution was thus authorized.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of dissolution and termination of corporate existence comply with the requirements of subsection (a) and are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such corporation, then the secretary of state shall file the articles of dissolution and termination of corporate existence. Upon such filing, the existence of the corporation shall cease, except that the termination of corporate existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the corporation, its directors, officers or shareholders, for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The shareholders, directors, and officers have the power to take such corporate or other action as may be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.01; 1989, ch. 451, § 18; 2010, ch. 741, § 3.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Monthly list of corporations surrendering charters, § 8-3-104.

Nonprofit corporations, dissolution, title 48, ch. 64.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-903.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 96.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-24-102. Dissolution by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation may be voluntarily dissolved by the written consent of its shareholders in accordance with § 48-17-104.

A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for submission to the shareholders.

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and

The shareholders entitled to vote shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (f).

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with § 48-17-105. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation.

Unless the charter or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (d)) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the proposal to dissolve to be adopted shall be approved by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on that proposal.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.02.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-901, 5-902.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 96.

48-24-103. Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date dissolution was authorized;

That the resolution was duly adopted by the shareholders; and

A copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the dissolution.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified in the articles of dissolution, a corporation is dissolved when the articles of dissolution are filed.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.03.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-901.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 96.

48-24-104. Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution at any time prior to filing the articles of termination of corporate existence by the secretary of state.

Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized by shareholders in any manner that dissolution may be authorized under § 48-24-102, unless the authorization for dissolution permitted revocation by action by the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder action.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of revocation of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation's board of directors (or incorporators) revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation's board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If shareholder action was required to revoke the dissolution, the information required by § 48-24-103(a)(3) and (4).

Revocation of dissolution is effective when the articles of revocation of dissolution are filed.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.04; 1989, ch. 451, § 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-904.

48-24-105. Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business, except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Conveying and disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation's property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation's share transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in chapter 18 of this title;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.05.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-901.

48-24-106. Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice must:

Describe information that must be included in a claim;

State whether the claim is admitted, or not admitted, and if admitted:

The amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date; and

Any interest obligation if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than four (4) months from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation must receive the claim; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred if written notice of the claim is not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved corporation delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subsection (b) and the claimant does not deliver a written notice of the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

If the dissolved corporation delivered written notice to the claimant that the claimant's claim is rejected, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within three (3) months from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.06.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-909 — 5-911.

Law Reviews.

How an Insolvent Business May Avoid Bankruptcy Court (and State Court, Too) (Tisha L. Federico), 35 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1999).

48-24-107. Unknown claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice must:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is or was last located;

Describe the information that must be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under § 48-24-106;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on; or

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this section:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation to the extent of the shareholder's pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to the shareholder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a shareholder's total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the shareholder.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.07.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-908.

Law Reviews.

How an Insolvent Business May Avoid Bankruptcy Court (and State Court, Too) (Tisha L. Federico), 35 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1999).

48-24-108. Articles of termination of corporate existence.

When a corporation has distributed all its assets to its creditors and shareholders and voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, it shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of termination of corporate existence. The articles shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

That all the assets of the corporation have been distributed to its creditors and shareholders; and

That the dissolution of the corporation has not been revoked.

If the secretary of state finds that the articles of termination of corporate existence comply with the requirements of subsection (a) and are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such corporation, then the secretary of state shall file the articles of termination of corporate existence. Upon such filing, the existence of the corporation shall cease, except that the termination of corporate existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the corporation, its directors, officers or shareholders, for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The shareholders, directors, and officers have the power to take such corporate or other action as may be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 14.08; 1987, ch. 273, § 38; 2010, ch. 741, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-906.

48-24-109. Discharge or reasonable provision to be made for payment of claims — Liability of directors.

Directors shall cause a dissolved corporation to discharge or make reasonable provision for the payment of claims and make distributions of assets to shareholders after payment or provision for claims.

Directors of a dissolved corporation that has disposed of claims under § 48-24-106 or § 48-24-107 shall not be liable for breach of subsection (a) with respect to claims against the dissolved corporation that are barred or satisfied under § 48-24-106 or § 48-24-107.

Acts 2015, ch. 60, § 5.